District of Columbia statutes.
32-1201

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Employer” means any individual, firm, association, corporation, the District of Columbia government, any receiver or trustee of any individual firm, association, or corporation, or the legal representative of a deceased employer, who uses the services of an individual (“employee”) for pay in the District.

(1A)

“Employee” means any individual whose services are used for pay in the District by any of the entities provided for in paragraph (1) of this section.

(2)

“Parent” means:

(A)

The natural mother or father of a child;

(B)

A person who has legal custody of a child;

(C)

A person who acts as a guardian of a child regardless of whether he or she has been appointed legally as such;

(D)

An aunt, uncle, or grandparent of a child; or

(E)

A person who is married to, or in a domestic partnership with a person listed in subparagraphs (A) through (D) of this paragraph.

(3)

“School-related event” means an activity sponsored by either a school or an associated organization such as a parent-teacher association. A school-related event includes: a student performance such as a concert, play, or rehearsal; the sporting game of a school team or practice; a meeting with a teacher or counselor; or any similar type of activity. A school-related event shall involve the parent’s child directly either as participant or subject but not as a spectator.

(4)

“District of Columbia Emancipation Day” means April 16th of each year.

(5)

“Domestic partnership” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-701(4).

History

Aug. 17, 1994, D.C. Law 10-146, § 2, 41 DCR 4477
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 44(a), 43 DCR 530
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-237, § 4(a), 48 DCR 597
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 18-33, § 5, 56 DCR 4269

Cross References

Complaints of violations, enforcement, see § 2-1411.03.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-1411.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-1601.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-237 added pars. (1A) and (4).
D.C. Law 18-33, in par. (2)(E), substituted “married to, or in a domestic partnership with,” for “married to”; and added par. (5).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4(a) of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Temporary Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-152, July 18, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 6102).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 4(a) of the District of Columbia Emancipation Day Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-307, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2710).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(a) of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-20, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2699).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 10-146, the “D.C. Parental Leave Act of 1994”, see Mayor’s Order 95-66, May 2, 1995.

Resolutions

Resolution 14-409, the “Council Emancipation Day Delegation Emergency Resolution of 2002”, was approved effective April 9, 2002.